Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Oregon Business Development Department,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General  Fund, the following amounts for
the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 401,613
(2) Infrastructure ........................... $ 807,749
(3) Arts ........................................... $ 4,818,295
(4) Debt service .............................. $111,134,553
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,685,000, for infrastructure, for  grants ap-
proved in section 497, chapter 114, Oregon Laws 2024.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for the  biennium beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $77,160,206, for infrastructure, for grants ap-
proved in section 9, chapter 109, Oregon Laws 2024.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there are appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the  following amounts, for infrastructure, for grants ap-
proved in section 5, chapter 103, Oregon Laws 2024:
(1) City of Toledo............................ $ 640,000
(2) City of McMinnville ................... $ 2,000,000
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there are  appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development  Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the  following amounts, for infrastructure, for grants ap-
proved in section 2, chapter 475, Oregon Laws 2023:
(1) Warm Springs water and
wastewater systems .................. $ 2,707,565
(2) St. Helens waterfront
redevelopment........................... $ 977,122
(3) Port of Coos Bay navigation
Enrolled House Bill 5024 (HB 5024-A) Page 1
channel...................................... $ 5,000,000
SECTION 6. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $100,000, for infrastructure, for grants approved
in section 28, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2023.
SECTION 7. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there are appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025,  out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for arts, for grants approved in
section 496, chapter 114, Oregon Laws 2024:
(1) Southern Oregon Historical
Society ...................................... $ 480,234
(2) Friends of the Oregon Caves
and Chateau .............................. $ 455,690
(3) Salem Parks Foundation ........... $ 150,000
(4) Clatsop County Historical
Society ...................................... $ 1,000,000
(5) Black United Fund of Oregon ... $ 900,000
(6) Very Little Theatre ................... $ 36,339
(7) Portland Institute for
Contemporary Art ..................... $ 135,625
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 8,475,102
(2) Business, innovation
and trade................................... $ 90,372,061
(3) Infrastructure ........................... $322,563,944
(4) Arts ........................................... $ 16,416,419
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$197,247,462 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Business Development  Department, from American
Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund  moneys received by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services and transferred to the  Oregon Business Development
Department, for infrastructure, for grants  approved in section 196, chapter 669, Oregon Laws
2021.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses by the Oregon Business  Development Department, from the Broadband Fund
established by ORS 285A.167, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 546,916
(2) Infrastructure ........................... $108,002,343
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic De-
velopment Fund to the Oregon  Business Development Department, for the following pur-
poses:
(1) Operations.................................  $ 19,816,525
(2) Business, innovation
and trade...................................  $ 78,857,998
(3) Infrastructure ...........................  $ 21,039,054
Enrolled House Bill 5024 (HB 5024-A) Page 2
(4) Oregon Film and Video Office .. $ 1,541,600
(5) Lottery bond debt service ......... $ 66,293,285
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Oregon  Business Development
Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 1,461,212
(2) Business, innovation
and trade................................... $ 59,333,558
(3) Infrastructure ........................... $219,985,409
(4) Arts ........................................... $ 2,301,442
SECTION 13. For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, expenditures by the Oregon Busi-
ness Development Department are not limited for:
(1) Loans from the following funds:
(a) Oregon Business Development  Fund (ORS 285B.092), Oregon Entrepreneurial Devel-
opment Loan  Fund (ORS 285B.758), Credit Enhancement Fund (ORS 285B.215) and Small
Business Expansion Loan Fund (ORS 285B.133).
(b) Special Public Works Fund (ORS 285B.455), Water Fund (ORS 285B.563), Marine  Nav-
igation Improvement Fund (ORS 777.267), Oregon Port Revolving Fund (ORS  285A.708), Safe
Drinking Water  Revolving Loan Fund (ORS 285A.213), Brownfields Redevelopment Fund (ORS
285A.188) and Oregon Brownfield Properties Revitalization Fund (ORS 285A.198).
(2) Debt service, excluding debt service on lottery revenue  bonds and general obligation
bonds.
SECTION 14.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5024 (HB 5024-A) Page 3